Washington statutes.
RCW 39.46.120

Notice of intent to sell general obligation bonds.

Notice of intent to sell general obligation bonds at a public sale shall be provided in a reasonable manner as determined by the legislative authority or governing body of the issuer.

[ 1984 c 186 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.